Arkansas, session 2025, HB1983.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
(a) The General Assembly finds:
(1) By Acts 1973, No. 167, the General Assembly authorized the
Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Tuberculosis Sanatorium at Booneville to
sell and convey to Westark Area Council, Inc., Boy Scouts of America, not
more than two thousand eight hundred forty-two (2,842) acres of surplus
lands, conditioned upon certain restrictive uses and related rights of
reverter recited in Acts 1973, No. 167;
(2) The sale and conveyance under Acts 1973, No. 167, was
accomplished by deed dated June 30, 1973, and recorded with the Circuit Clerk
of Logan County, Arkansas, on February 18, 1976, at Miscellaneous Deed Book
79, page 534, with the deed incorporating by reference all of the restrictive
uses and related rights of reverter prescribed by Acts 1973, No. 167;
(3) By Acts 1991, No. 38, the General Assembly sought to confirm
*MBM207*
04/03/2025 1:16:48 PM MBM207

HB1983
the earlier conveyance, noting in its legislative intent that as a result
of a survey, an ambiguity may exist regarding the subject matter of Acts
1973, No. 167, and to “preempt any questions which may arise regarding the
subject matter of Act 167 of 1973 such that the Westark Area Council, Inc.,
of the Boy Scouts of America may forever be free from any danger, however
remote, of a hostile claim,” authorized the Developmental Disabilities
Services Board to execute a quitclaim deed in favor of Westark Area Council,
Inc., of the Boy Scouts of America;
(4) The quitclaim deed under Acts 1991, No. 38, was executed on
September 19, 1991, and recorded with the Circuit Clerk of Logan County on
October 17, 1991;
(5) Despite the intentions expressed by Acts 1991, No. 38,
reasonable concern for hostile claims against the Westark Area Council, Inc.,
of the Boy Scouts of America arising from these acts and deeds continues to
exist as follows:
(A) The quitclaim deed related to Acts 1973, No. 167,
recites two thousand eight hundred fifty-two (2,852) acres, being ten (10)
more acres than the legal description in Acts 1973, No. 167 and Acts 1991,
No. 38;
(B) There is uncertainty as to whether the Developmental
Disabilities Services Board was the full and apt successor in interest to the
Arkansas Tuberculosis Sanatorium with authority to release by quitclaim deed
any additional real property, or the original conditions of use or rights of
reverter, which the Arkansas Tuberculosis Sanatorium retained by virtue of
Acts 1973, No. 167; and
(C) There is uncertainty whether Acts 1991, No. 38, based
on resolving ambiguities arising from a survey, intended or had the effect of
releasing conditions of use and rights of reverter unrelated to any survey;
(6) Westark Area Council, Inc., of the Boy Scouts of America, by
Articles of Merger duly filed with the Secretary of State and effective
November 16, 2023, merged into and with Quapaw Area Council Incorporated of
the Boy Scouts of America, creating as successor in interest to Westark Area
Council, Inc., of the Boy Scouts of America, the Natural State Council of Boy
Scouts of America, Inc.; and
(7) While the land subject to Acts 1973, No. 167 and Acts 1991,
No. 38 has excess acreage beyond what is necessary to maintain a safe and
04/03/2025 1:16:48 PM MBM207

HB1983
appropriate facility for Boy Scout camping and activities, the Natural State
Council of Boy Scouts of America, Inc., has expressed that any plan for the
future of the land includes reserving and maintaining appropriate land and
facilities to be retained in perpetuity for Boy Scout camping, training, and
other scouting activities.
(b) It is the intent of this act to clarify and confirm absolute and
sole title to the subject property, as described in the 1991 quitlcaim deed,
in Westark Area Council, Inc., of the Boy Scouts of America, specifically
free and clear of any and all conditions or restrictive uses or rights of
reverter in favor of the State of Arkansas or any of its agencies or
instrumentalities with the exception of Lot 9 and Lot 10 of the Southwest
Quarter of Section 31, Township 5, Range 28 West, Logan County, Arkansas and
the Southwest Quarter of the Southeast Quarter, Section 31, Township 5 North,
Range 28 West, Logan County, Arkansas, and those portions of Lots 1 and 3 of
the Fractional Northeast Quarter and of Lots 1 and 2 of the Fractional
Northwest Quarter, lying East of Boy Scout Road and West of an unnamed road
running North and South within the Fractional Northeast Quarter, all in
Section 1, Township 4 North, Range 29 West, which shall be used in connection
with boy scouts programs benefiting boy scouts throughout Arkansas, girl
scouts and other proposed youth recreational activities, or for partial or
controlled use under agreement with the Arkansas State Game and Fish
Commission and other public agencies where the use for public purposes will
not impair the uses by the Boy Scouts for scouts and youth recreational
purposes.

SECTION 2. Acts 1973, No. 167, § 4, concerning the sale of certain
property to the Westark Area Council, Inc., Boy Scouts of America, is amended
to read as follows:
SECTION 4. Upon determining the acquisition cost in public funds for
the initial acquisition of the described lands, and upon completion of the
appraisal of the estimated current value of man-made buildings and structures
located upon said lands which were provided from public funds, the Board
shall certify the amount thereof, together with the estimated cost for the
sale of said lands as provided herein, to the Governor, together with a copy
of the proposal received from the Boy Scouts for the acquisition of the
described lands for purchase by cash, or for the lease of said lands for a
04/03/2025 1:16:48 PM MBM207

HB1983
period of not more than five years to the Boy Scouts, with the option of the
Boy Scouts to purchase the described lands for cash within the period of the
lease, not to exceed five years. Upon receipt thereof, the Governor shall
review the same, and if he shall determine that all matters pertaining
thereto have been in compliance with the provisions of this Act, he shall by
proclamation certify his approval thereof and furnish same to the Board. The
Board shall notify the Westark Area Council, Inc., Boy Scouts of America of
the approval of the Governor thereof, and may proceed to sell the same for
cash, or, to lease said lands to the Boy Scouts for a period not exceeding
five years at an annual lease rental of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per
year, with the option of the Boy Scouts to purchase said lands for cash at
any time within the period of the lease, not exceeding five years, and if the
option to purchase is exercised by the Boy Scouts, any amounts paid as lease
rental shall be applied against the purchase price of the land. The term
"purchase for cash", as used in this Act, shall mean the amount certified to
the Governor by the Board consisting of the actual initial purchase price to
the State of Arkansas for the acquisition of the described lands, the
appraised current value of man-made buildings and structures located on said
lands provided by public funds, and the estimated cost of the sale of said
lands as provided in this Act.
Upon payment in cash for said lands as provided herein, the Board shall
convey to the Boy Scouts the title to said lands conditioned upon said lands
Lot 9 and Lot 10 of the Southwest Quarter of Section 31, Township 5, Range 28
West, Logan County, Arkansas and the Southwest Quarter of the Southeast
Quarter, Section 31, Township 5 North, Range 28 West, Logan County, Arkansas,
and those portions of Lots 1 and 3 of the Fractional Northeast Quarter and
of Lots 1 and 2 of the Fractional Northwest Quarter, lying East of Boy Scout
Road and West of an unnamed road running North and South within the
Fractional Northeast Quarter, all in Section 1, Township 4 North, Range 29
West, being used solely by the Boy Scouts in connection with boy scouts
programs benefiting boy scouts throughout Arkansas, or for girl scouts and
other proposed youth recreational activities, or for partial or controlled
use thereof under agreement with the Game and Fish Commission and other
public agencies where the use thereof for such public purposes will not
impair the uses by the Boy Scouts for scouts and youth recreational purposes,
and that said lands Lot 9 and Lot 10 of the Southwest Quarter of Section 31,
04/03/2025 1:16:48 PM MBM207

HB1983
Township 5, Range 28 West, Logan County, Arkansas and the Southwest Quarter
of the Southeast Quarter, Section 31, Township 5 North, Range 28 West, Logan
County, Arkansas, and those portions of Lots 1 and 3 of the Fractional
Northeast Quarter and of Lots 1 and 2 of the Fractional Northwest Quarter,
lying East of Boy Scout Road and West of an unnamed road running North and
South within the Fractional Northeast Quarter, all in Section 1, Township 4
North, Range 29 West, not be sold, donated, conveyed, leased, or used for any
other purpose. Said sale, and the conveyance of said lands, shall be
conditioned upon the title to all of said lands, or any portions thereof, Lot
9 and Lot 10 of the Southwest Quarter of Section 31, Township 5, Range 28
West, Logan County, Arkansas and the Southwest Quarter of the Southeast
Quarter, Section 31, Township 5 North, Range 28 West, Logan County, Arkansas,
and those portions of Lots 1 and 3 of the Fractional Northeast Quarter and
of Lots 1 and 2 of the Fractional Northwest Quarter, lying East of Boy Scout
Road and West of an unnamed road running North and South within the
Fractional Northeast Quarter, all in Section 1, Township 4 North, Range 29
West, to revert to the State of Arkansas in the event the Boy Scouts of
America shall cease to use all of said lands, or any portion of said lands,
Lot 9 and Lot 10 of the Southwest Quarter of Section 31, Township 5, Range 28
West, Logan County, Arkansas and the Southwest Quarter of the Southeast
Quarter, Section 31, Township 5 North, Range 28 West, Logan County, Arkansas,
and those portions of Lots 1 and 3 of the Fractional Northeast Quarter and
of Lots 1 and 2 of the Fractional Northwest Quarter, lying East of Boy Scout
Road and West of an unnamed road running North and South within the
Fractional Northeast Quarter, all in Section 1, Township 4 North, Range 29
West, for Boy Scouts purposes or other provisions provided for herein, for a
period of five years. The conveyance of the land shall be by deed executed
and delivered by the Board on behalf of the State of Arkansas conveying the
said lands to the Westark Area Council, Inc., Boy Scouts of America. The
said deed shall recite in detail the compliance with respective provisions of
this Act, and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts so set forth. The
said deed need not be acknowledged to entitle it to record. The effect of
said deed, the provisions of this Act having been substantially complied with
in the said sale, shall vest in said purchaser the title to said lands, at
law and in equity, subject to the reservations and restrictions as provided
in this Act. This act shall not impose conditions of use or rights of
04/03/2025 1:16:48 PM MBM207

HB1983
reverter on portions of the lands outside of Lot 9 and Lot 10 of the
Southwest Quarter of Section 31, Township 5, Range 28 West, Logan County,
Arkansas and the Southwest Quarter of the Southeast Quarter, Section 31,
Township 5 North, Range 28 West, Logan County, Arkansas, and those portions
of Lots 1 and 3 of the Fractional Northeast Quarter and of Lots 1 and 2 of
the Fractional Northwest Quarter, lying East of Boy Scout Road and West of an
unnamed road running North and South within the Fractional Northeast Quarter,
all in Section 1, Township 4 North, Range 29 West.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. ISSUANCE OF QUITCLAIM DEED. The
Commissioner of State Lands and the Board of Developmental Disabilities
Services, as successors in interest and on behalf of the Arkansas
Tuberculosis Sanatorium, and any other agency or instrumentality of the State
of Arkansas which may claim an interest in the lands, shall execute and
convey by quitclaim deed to the Natural State Council of Boy Scouts of
America, Inc., the lands described in Acts 1991, No. 38, and its related
quitclaim deed, specifically quitclaiming and releasing any and all
conditions of use or rights of reverter in the lands with the exception of
Lot 9 and Lot 10 of the Southwest Quarter of Section 31, Township 5, Range 28
West, Logan County, Arkansas and the Southwest Quarter of the Southeast
Quarter, Section 31, Township 5 North, Range 28 West, Logan County, Arkansas,
and those portions of Lots 1 and 3 of the Fractional Northeast Quarter and
of Lots 1 and 2 of the Fractional Northwest Quarter, lying East of Boy Scout
Road and West of an unnamed road running North and South within the
Fractional Northeast Quarter, all in Section 1, Township 4 North, Range 29
West, to be used for the purposes provided under Acts 1973, No. 167, § 4, as
amended by this act.









04/03/2025 1:16:48 PM MBM207